Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2805.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7140 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


HB2805 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Medical Loss Ratios for Dental (DLR) Health Care Services Plans
Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7141 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this act:
1. "Commissioner" means the Insurance Commissioner of this
state;
2. "Dental carrier" or "carrier" means a dental insurance
company, dental service corporation, dental plan organization
authorized to provide dental benefits, or a health benefits plan
that includes coverage for dental services;
3. "Dental health care service plan" or "plan" means any plan
that provides coverage for dental health care services to enrollees
in exchange for premiums, and does not include plans under Medicaid
or Children's Health Insurance Program (CHIP); and
4. "Dental loss ratio" or "DLR" means percentage of premium
dollars spent on patient care as calculated pursuant to subsection B
in this section.
B. The dental loss ratio is calculated by dividing the
numerator by the denominator, where:
1. The numerator is the sum of the amount incurred for clinical
dental services provided to enrollees, the amount incurred on
HB2805 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

acti vities that improve dental care quality, and other incurred
claims as defined at 45 C.F.R., Section 158.140(a); and
2. The denominator is the total amount of premium revenue,
excluding federal and state taxes, licensing and regulatory fees
paid, nonprofit community expenditures as defined at 45 C.F.R.,
Section 158.162(c), and any other payments required by federal law.
C. The Commissioner shall define by rule:
1. Expenditures for clinical dental services;
2. Activities that improve dental care quality, activities
conducted by an issuer intended to improve dental care quality shall
not exceed five percent (5%) of net premium revenue; and
3. Overhead and administrative cost expenditures.
D. The definitions promulgated by rule pursuant to this section
shall be consistent with similar definitions that are used for the
reporting of medical loss ratios by carriers offering health benefit
plans in this state. Overhead and administrative costs shall not be
included in the numerator.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7142 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A carrier that issues, sells, renews, or offers a
specialized dental health care service plan contract shall file a
Dental Loss Ratio (DLR) annual report with the Commissioner that is
organized by market and product type and contains the same
HB2805 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

info rmation required in the 2013 federal Medical Loss Ratio (MLR)
Annual Reporting Form (CMS-10418). The filing shall also report
additional data that includes the number of enrollees, the plan
cost-sharing and deductible amounts, the annual maximum coverage
limit, and the number of enrollees who meet or exceed the annual
coverage limit.
B. The DLR reporting year shall be for the fiscal year during
which dental coverage is provided by the plan. All terms used in
the DLR annual report shall have the same meaning as used in the
federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C., Section 300gg-18),
Part 158 (commencing with 158.101) of Title 45 of the Code of
Federal Regulations, and 42 U.S.C., Section 1367.003.
C. If data verification of the carrier's representations in the
DLR annual report is deemed necessary, the Commissioner shall
provide the carrier with a notification thirty (30) days to submit
any information required by the Commissioner.
D. By January 1 of the year after the Commissioner receives the
dental loss ratio information collected pursuant to subsection A of
this section, the Commissioner shall make the information, including
the aggregate dental loss ratio and other data reported pursuant to
this section, available to the public in a searchable format on a
public website that allows members of the public to compare dental
loss ratios among carriers by plan type by:
1. Posting the information on the division’s website; or
HB2805 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. Providing the information to the administrator of an all-
payer health claims database. If the Commissioner provides the
information to the administrator, the administrator shall make the
information available to the public in a format determined by the
Commissioner.
E. The Commissioner shall report the data in this section to
the Legislature.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7143 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Commissioner shall aggregate dental loss ratios for each
carrier by year pursuant to Section 3 of this act for each market
segment in which the carrier operates. The Commissioner shall
calculate an average dental loss ratio (DLR) for each market segment
using aggregate data for a three-year period including data for the
most recent dental loss ratio reporting year and the data for the
two (2) prior dental loss ratio reporting years.
Newer experience shall be subject to reporting standards defined
in 45 C.F.R., Section 158.121.
B. The Commissioner shall calculate an average dental loss
ratio for each market segment using the data pursuant to subsection
A of this section, identify as outliers dental plans that fall
outside one standard deviation of the average dental loss ratio, and

HB2805 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

repo rt those plans to the Legislature consistent with the manner set
forth in subsections D and E of Section 3 of this act.
A carrier shall not be considered an outlier if its DLR in a
market segment is within three (3) percentage points of the average
dental loss ratio. A higher threshold may be set in unique
circumstances as determined reasonable by the Commissioner.
C. The Commissioner shall investigate those carriers that
report a DLR lower than one standard deviation from the mathematical
average, and may take remediation or enforcement actions against
them, including ordering such carriers to rebate, in a manner
consistent with 45 C.F.R., Part 158(B) of the Affordable Care Act
all premiums paid above such amounts that would have caused said
carrier to have achieved the mathematical average of the data
submitted in a given year for a given market segment.
D. The report in subsection B of this section shall be
organized to show year-over-year changes in a carrier’s outlier
status relative to meeting the one (1) standard deviation outlier
standard at subsection B of this section. If the DLR for a carrier
in a market segment does not increase and remains an outlier as
defined in subsection B of this section after two (2) consecutive
years, barring unique circumstances as determined reasonable by the
Commissioner, the carrier shall be subject to a minimum DLR
percentage by market segment. The Commissioner shall promulgate
rules establishing the DLR percentage based on, at minimum, the
HB2805 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

aver age of existing carrier loss ratios by market segment in the
state to be effective no sooner than forty-two (42) months after a
carrier is determined to be an outlier as defined in this section.
E. A carrier subject to remediation in subsections C and D of
this section shall provide any rebate owing to a policyholder no
later than March 1 of the fiscal year following the year for which
the ratio described in subsection A of this section was calculated.
The Commissioner may establish alternatives to direct rebates to
include premium reductions in the following benefit year.
F. The Commissioner may promulgate rules that create a process
to identify carriers that increase rates in excess of the percentage
increase of the latest dental services Consumer Price Index as
reported through the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.
G. The Commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to
effectuate the provisions of this act.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/06/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.






HB2805 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.